Utah statutes.
16-7-11.   Fees for filing documents and issuing certificates.

The division shall charge and collect a fee determined by it pursuant to Section 63J-1-504 for:

(1)  filing articles of incorporation of a corporation sole and issuing a certificate of incorporation;

(2)  filing articles of amendment and issuing a certificate of amendment;

(3)  issuing each additional certificate of incorporation or amendment;

(4)  filing a certificate of authorized agent and issuing the agent's certificate;

(5)  filing a revocation of authority;

(6)  furnishing a certified copy of any document, instrument, or paper relating to a corporation sole and affixing its seal;

(7)  issuing a certificate of dissolution; and

(8)  issuing a certificate of merger or consolidation.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

